Louisiana, session 2026, HB846.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:53(A)(3) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§53. Proper equipment required on vehicles; display of plate
A.
* * *
(3)(a) Every permanent registration license plate shall at all times be
securely fastened to the vehicle to which it is assigned, so as to prevent the plate
from swinging, and at a height not less than twelve inches from the ground,
measuring from the bottom of such plate, in a place and position to be clearly visible,
and shall be maintained free from foreign materials and in a condition to be clearly
legible. Unless authorized by the commissioner, a person shall not apply a any
covering, film, electrochromatic film, coating, spray, frame, bracket, or any
substance to , electronic or nonelectronic device, or any material over or on the
license plate or use an electronic device or electrochromatic film that obscures from
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 846 ENROLLED
any angle the numbers, characters, year registration sticker, or name of the
jurisdiction issuing the plate.
(b) For purposes of this Paragraph, "obscure" shall refer to any action or
method that diminishes the visibility, legibility, or reflectivity of any numbers,
characters, decals, stickers, symbols, or jurisdictional identifiers on a license plate.
(c) Notwithstanding the penalty provisions contained in R.S. 32:57, any
person who violates the provisions provided for in this Paragraph shall incur a fine
not to exceed seventy-five dollars for the first offense and a fine of two hundred fifty
dollars for a second and any subsequent offense.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.